Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.093

Washington state patrol—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the Washington state patrol to confidential secretaries of agency bureau chiefs, or their functional equivalent, and a confidential secretary for the chief of staff.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 404; 1993 c 281 s 24; 1990 c 14 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.